Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 65. Rights and Privileges

§ 1271.
Pay and rations.

When the State Guard or any part of it is ordered out for active duty or field training, its members shall be entitled to the same pay and rations as the National Guard on similar duty and shall be paid under rules adopted by the Governor.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 136;

2021, No. 10

, § 66.

§§ 1272,
1273.
Repealed.
1969, No. 261 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 7, 1970.

§ 1274.
Exemptions.

No officer or enlisted member of the State Guard shall be arrested on any warrant, except for treason, felony, or breach of the peace, while going to, remaining at, or returning from a place where he or she is ordered for military duty. Every officer and enlisted member of the State Guard shall, during service in the State Guard, be exempt from service in any posse comitatus and from jury duty.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 67.